Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 6
COURT PROCEEDINGS

19-2.5-601. Appointment of guardian ad litem.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem pursuant to section 19-1-111 for a juvenile in a proceeding brought pursuant to this article 2.5.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 599, § 2, effective October 1.

19-2.5-602. General procedure for juvenile hearings.

The Colorado rules of juvenile procedure apply in all proceedings conducted pursuant to this article 2.5.

Hearings must be held before the court without a jury, except as set forth in sections 19-2.5-610 and 19-2.5-503 (3), and may be conducted in an informal manner.

A verbatim record must be taken of all proceedings, including any hearing conducted by a magistrate.

When more than one juvenile is named in a petition or individual petitions are filed against more than one juvenile alleging delinquent acts arising from the same delinquent episode, any proceedings, including trials, may be consolidated.

Juvenile cases must be heard separately from adult cases, and the juvenile or the juvenile's parents, guardian, or other custodian may be heard separately when deemed necessary by the court.

The juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal custodian is required to attend all proceedings, including all hearings, concerning the juvenile. Failure, without good cause, to attend a proceeding concerning the juvenile may subject the parent, guardian, or
legal custodian to contempt sanctions; except that, if the juvenile's legal custodian is a county department of human or social services or the state department of human services, the legal custodian need not attend any proceeding
at which the juvenile's guardian ad litem is present.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 599, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-109 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-603. Notification. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 600, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
Entire section repealed, (SB 22-018), ch. 191, p. 1274, § 8, effective July 15.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-509 (9) as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-604. Open hearings.

The general public must not be excluded from hearings held pursuant to this article 2.5 unless the court determines that it is in the best interest of the juvenile or of the community to exclude the general public. In such event, the court shall admit
only such persons as have an interest in the case or work of the court, including persons whom the district attorney, the juvenile, or the juvenile's parents or guardian wishes to be present.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 600, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-110 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-605. Advisement - right to counsel - waiver of right to counsel - definition.

At the juvenile's first appearance before the court, after the detention hearing or at the first appearance if the juvenile appears on a summons, the court shall advise the juvenile and the juvenile's parents, guardian, or other legal custodian of the
juvenile's constitutional rights and legal rights as set forth in rule 3 of the Colorado rules of juvenile procedure, including but not limited to the right to counsel. The advisement must include the possibility of restorative
justice practices, including victim-offender conferences if restorative justice practices are available in the jurisdiction. The advisement regarding restorative justice practices does not establish any right to restorative
justice practices on the juvenile's behalf.

If the respondent has made an early application for appointed counsel for the juvenile and the office of the state public defender has made a preliminary determination that the juvenile is eligible for appointed counsel as set forth in section 21-1-103
or if the court has appointed counsel for the juvenile pursuant to section 19-2.5-305 (2), an attorney from the office of the state public defender or, in the case of a conflict, from the office of alternate defense counsel,
shall be available to represent the juvenile at the juvenile's first appearance, as described in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

If the respondent has not made an early application for appointed counsel for the juvenile but the juvenile requests appointment of counsel at the first appearance, the court shall determine if the juvenile is eligible for counsel pursuant to subsection
(2)(a) of this section.

As used in this subsection (1), unless the context otherwise requires, "early application" means that the respondent has contacted the office of the state public defender and applied for representation of the juvenile by the state public defender not
less than five days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, before the juvenile's scheduled court date for the first appearance and has provided sufficient information to the office of the state public defender
to allow that office to make a preliminary determination of eligibility for representation.

Failure of the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal custodian to apply for court-appointed counsel may not be construed as a waiver of the right to counsel or any other rights held by the juvenile.

If the juvenile and the juvenile's parents, guardian, or other legal custodian are found to be indigent pursuant to section 21-1-103 (3), or the juvenile's parents, guardian, or other legal custodian refuses to retain counsel for the juvenile, or the
court, on its own motion, determines that counsel is necessary to protect the interests of the juvenile or other parties, or the juvenile is in the custody of the state department of human services or a county department
of human or social services, the court shall appoint the office of state public defender or, in the case of a conflict, the office of alternate defense counsel for the juvenile; except that the court shall not appoint the
office of the state public defender or the office of alternate defense counsel if:

The juvenile has retained the juvenile's own counsel; or

The juvenile has made a knowing, intelligent, and voluntary waiver of the juvenile's right to counsel, as described in subsection (2)(c) of this section.

Repealed.

The court may accept a waiver of counsel by a juvenile only after finding on the record, based on a dialogue conducted with the juvenile, that the juvenile:

Is of a sufficient maturity level to make a voluntary, knowing, and intelligent waiver of the right to counsel;

Understands the sentencing options that are available to the court in the event of an adjudication or conviction of the offense with which the juvenile is charged;

Has not been coerced by any other party, including but not limited to the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, into making the waiver;

Understands that the court will provide counsel for the juvenile if the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal custodian is unable or unwilling to obtain counsel for the juvenile; and

Understands the possible consequences that may result from an adjudication or conviction of the offense with which the juvenile is charged, which consequences may occur in addition to the actual adjudication or conviction itself.

The appointment of counsel pursuant to this subsection (2) continues until:

The court's jurisdiction is terminated;

The juvenile or the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal custodian retains counsel for the juvenile;

The court finds that the juvenile or the juvenile's parents, guardian, or other legal custodian has sufficient financial means to retain counsel or that the juvenile's parents, guardian, or other legal custodian no longer refuses to retain counsel for
the juvenile; or

The court finds the juvenile has made a knowing, intelligent, and voluntary waiver of the juvenile's right to counsel, as described in subsection (2)(c) of this section.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 600, § 2, effective October 1; (2)(b) repealed, (HB 21-1315), ch. 461, p. 3116, § 25, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-706 as it existed prior to 2021.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1315, see section 1 of chapter 461, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

19-2.5-606. Preadjudication service program - creation.

The chief judge of any judicial district may issue an order that any juvenile who applies for preadjudication release be evaluated for placement by a preadjudication service program established pursuant to this section. In evaluating the juvenile, the
service program shall follow criteria for the placement of a juvenile established pursuant to section 19-2.5-1404. Upon evaluation, the service program shall make a recommendation to the court concerning placement of the
juvenile with a preadjudication service program.

Parents or legal guardians of a juvenile evaluated by a preadjudication service program shall complete the information form described in section 19-2.5-1404 (1)(b)(VIII) no later than two business days after the evaluation or prior to the juvenile's first
detention hearing, whichever occurs first. If available, the screening team or preadjudication service program shall file the original completed information form with the court. If the information form has not been completed
at the time of the detention hearing, the court shall direct the parent or legal guardian to immediately complete the form and file it with the court. The screening team, preadjudication service program, or the court shall
deliver a copy of the information form to the division of youth services; the guardian ad litem, if any; and the county department of human or social services no later than seven business days after the date of the detention
hearing.

Any county or city and county or judicial district in the state may establish a preadjudication service program for use by the district court for the county or city and county or judicial district. Such program must be established in accordance with a
local justice plan developed pursuant to section 19-2.5-302.

The local justice plan must provide for the assessment of juveniles taken into custody and detained by law enforcement officers. The assessment must be based on criteria for the placement of juveniles established pursuant to section 19-2.5-1404, so that
relevant information may be presented to the judge presiding over the detention hearing. The information provided to the court through the screening process, including the record of any prior adjudication of the juvenile, is intended
to enhance the court's ability to make a more appropriate detention and bond decision, based on facts relative to the juvenile's substantial risk of serious harm to others.

The plan may include different methods and levels of community-based supervision as conditions for preadjudication release, including the possibility of release without formal supervision. The plan may provide for the use of the same supervision methods
that have been established for adult defendants as a pretrial release method to reduce pretrial incarceration or that have been established as sentencing alternatives for juvenile or adult offenders placed on probation or parole.
The use of such supervision methods is intended to reduce preadjudication detentions without sacrificing the protection of the community from juveniles who may be risks to the public. The plan may allow for the release of the juvenile
to the juvenile's home with no formal supervision or provide for the use of any of the following supervision methods as conditions of preadjudication release:

Periodic telephone communications with the juvenile;

Periodic office visits by the juvenile to the preadjudication service program;

Periodic home visits to the juvenile's home;

If a validated mental health or substance use screening and subsequent mental health or substance use assessment indicates that the juvenile has a need:

Periodic drug testing of the juvenile; or

Behavioral or mental health or substance use treatment for the juvenile, which may include residential treatment;

Periodic visits to the juvenile's school;

Domestic violence or child abuse counseling for the juvenile, if applicable;

Electronic or global position monitoring of the juvenile;

Work release for the juvenile, if school attendance is not applicable or appropriate under the circumstances; or

Juvenile day reporting and day treatment programs.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 603, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-302 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-607. Mandatory protection order.

A mandatory protection order is created against any juvenile charged with the commission of a delinquent act and the juvenile's parents or legal guardian. The order remains in effect from the time that the juvenile is advised of the juvenile's rights
and informed of the order at the juvenile's first appearance before the court until final disposition of the action or, in the case of an appeal, until disposition of the appeal. The order restrains the juvenile and the
juvenile's parents or legal guardian from harassing, molesting, intimidating, retaliating against, or tampering with any witness to or victim of the delinquent act charged.

The protection order issued pursuant to this section must be on a standardized form prescribed by the judicial department, and a copy must be provided to the protected parties.

At the time of the juvenile's first appearance before the court, the court shall inform the juvenile and the juvenile's parents or legal guardian of the protection order effective pursuant to this section and shall also inform the juvenile and the juvenile's
parents or legal guardian that a violation of such order is punishable as contempt of court.

Nothing in this section precludes the juvenile or the juvenile's parents or legal guardian from applying to the court at any time for modification or dismissal of the protection order issued pursuant to this section or the district attorney from applying
to the court at any time for additional provisions under the protection order, modification of the order, or dismissal of the order. The trial court shall retain jurisdiction to enforce, modify, or dismiss the protection order
during the pendency of any appeal that may be brought.

The duties of peace officers enforcing orders issued pursuant to this section are in accordance with section 18-6-803.5 and any rules adopted by the Colorado supreme court pursuant to said section.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 604, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-707 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-608. Fingerprinting - ordered by court - definition.

For purposes of this section, "juvenile" means any juvenile who is charged with committing, summoned, or held in detention for committing a delinquent act that constitutes a felony, a class 1 misdemeanor, or a misdemeanor pursuant to section 42-4-1301
or a crime, the underlying factual basis of which included an act of domestic violence, as defined in section 18-6-800.3 (1), as if committed by an adult.

If a juvenile has not been fingerprinted prior to the juvenile's first appearance before the court, the court shall order the juvenile to report to an entity authorized by the court or the local law enforcement agency for fingerprinting, except for juvenile
detention centers and alternative service programs, otherwise known as "SB 91-94 programs", described in section 19-2.5-606. The authorized entity or local law enforcement agency shall endorse upon a copy of the order the completion
of the fingerprinting and return the same to the court. The authorized entity or local law enforcement agency shall forward a set of fingerprints ordered pursuant to this subsection (2) to the Colorado bureau of investigation in
the form and manner prescribed by the bureau.

Any fingerprints required by this section to be forwarded to the Colorado bureau of investigation must be forwarded within twenty-four hours after completion of the fingerprinting, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 605, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-503.5 (1), (3), and (4) as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-609. Preliminary hearing - dispositional hearing.

The district attorney or a juvenile who is accused in a petition of a delinquent act that constitutes a class 1, 2, or 3 felony may demand and receive a preliminary hearing to determine if there is probable cause to believe that the delinquent act alleged
in the petition was committed by the juvenile. In addition, the district attorney or a juvenile who is accused in a petition of only those delinquent acts that constitute class 4, 5, or 6 felonies, which felonies require mandatory
sentencing, constitute crimes of violence as defined in section 18-1.3-406, or constitute sexual offenses pursuant to part 4 of article 3 of title 18, may demand and receive a preliminary hearing to determine if there is probable
cause to believe that the juvenile committed the delinquent act alleged in the petition. A preliminary hearing may be heard by a judge of the juvenile court or by a magistrate and conducted as follows:

At the juvenile's advisement hearing and after the filing of the delinquency petition, the prosecution shall make available to the juvenile the discovery material required by the Colorado rules of juvenile procedure. The juvenile or the prosecution may
file a written motion for a preliminary hearing, stating the basis therefor. Upon the filing of the motion, the court shall set the matter for a hearing. The juvenile or the prosecution shall file a written motion for a
preliminary hearing not later than fourteen days after the advisement hearing.

If the juvenile is being detained because of the delinquent act alleged in the petition, the preliminary hearing must be held within thirty-five days after the filing of the motion, unless good cause for continuing the hearing beyond that time is shown
to the court. If the juvenile is not being detained, it must be held as promptly as the calendar of the court permits.

At the preliminary hearing, the juvenile shall not be called upon to plead, although the juvenile may cross-examine the prosecution witnesses and may introduce evidence in the juvenile's own behalf. The prosecution has the burden of establishing probable
cause. The court at the hearing may temper the rules of evidence in the exercise of sound judicial discretion.

If the court determines that probable cause exists, it shall enter a finding to that effect and schedule an adjudicatory trial. If from the evidence it appears to the court that probable cause does not exist, it shall dismiss the delinquency petition
and the court shall discharge the juvenile from any restriction or other previous temporary order stemming from the petition.

The district attorney and the juvenile who is accused in a petition of a delinquent act that constitutes a class 4, 5, or 6 felony, except those that require mandatory sentencing, that constitute crimes of violence as defined in section 18-1.3-406, or
that constitute sexual offenses pursuant to part 4 of article 3 of title 18, do not have the right to demand or receive a preliminary hearing but shall participate in a dispositional hearing for the purposes of case evaluation
and potential resolution. A judge of the juvenile court or a magistrate may hear the dispositional hearing.

Any juvenile accused of a class 4, 5, or 6 felony who is not otherwise entitled to a preliminary hearing pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section may demand and shall receive a preliminary hearing within a reasonable time pursuant to subsection (1)
of this section if the juvenile is in custody; except that, upon motion of either party, the court shall vacate the preliminary hearing if there is a reasonable showing that the juvenile has been released from custody prior
to the preliminary hearing.

A request for review of a preliminary hearing finding entered by a magistrate must be filed pursuant to section 19-1-108 (5.5), and review must be conducted pursuant to said section.

The prosecution may file a motion to refile the petition in delinquency, which motion must be accompanied by a verified affidavit stating the grounds therefor.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 605, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-705 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-610. Right to jury trial.

In any action in delinquency in which a juvenile is alleged to be an aggravated juvenile offender, as described in section 19-2.5-1125, or is alleged to have committed an act that would constitute a crime of violence, as defined in section 18-1.3-406,
if committed by an adult, the juvenile or the district attorney may demand a trial by a jury of not more than six persons, except as provided in section 19-2.5-503 (3)(a), or the court, on its own motion, may order the jury to
try any case brought pursuant to this title 19, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

The juvenile is not entitled to a trial by jury when the petition alleges a delinquent act that is a misdemeanor, a petty offense, a violation of a municipal or county ordinance, or a violation of a court order.

Unless a jury is demanded pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, it is deemed waived.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article 2.5, in any action in delinquency in which a juvenile requests a jury pursuant to this section, the juvenile is deemed to have waived the sixty-day requirement for holding the adjudicatory trial established
in section 19-2.5-902. In such a case, the juvenile's right to a speedy trial is governed by section 18-1-405 and rule 48 (b) of the Colorado rules of criminal procedure.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 607, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-107 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-611. Contempt - warrant - legislative declaration.

Except as otherwise set forth in subsection (3) of this section, any person summoned or required to appear pursuant to section 19-2.5-501 who has acknowledged service and fails to appear without reasonable cause may be proceeded against for contempt of
court.

If after reasonable effort the summons cannot be served or if the welfare of the juvenile requires that the juvenile be brought immediately into the custody of the court, a bench warrant may be issued for the parents, guardian, or other legal custodian
or for the juvenile.

When a parent or other person who signed a written promise to appear and bring the juvenile to court or who has waived or acknowledged service fails to appear with the juvenile on the date set by the court, a bench warrant may be issued for the parent
or other person, the juvenile, or both.

Whenever a parent or guardian or person with whom the juvenile resides, if other than the parent or guardian, who has received a summons to appear fails, without good cause, to appear on any other date set by the court, a bench warrant must be issued
for the parent, guardian, or person with whom the juvenile resides, and the parent, guardian, or person with whom the juvenile resides is subject to contempt.

For purposes of this subsection (3), good cause for failing to appear includes but is not limited to a situation where a parent or guardian:

Does not have physical custody of the juvenile and resides outside of Colorado;

Has physical custody of the juvenile but resides outside of Colorado and appearing in court will result in undue hardship to the parent or guardian; or

Resides in Colorado but is outside of the state at the time of the juvenile proceeding for reasons other than avoiding appearance before the court and appearing in court will result in undue hardship to the parent or guardian.

The nonappearance of the parent, guardian, or person with whom the juvenile resides is not the basis for a continuance.

This subsection (3) is not applicable to any proceeding in a case that has been transferred to the district court pursuant to section 19-2.5-802.

The general assembly declares that every parent or guardian whose juvenile is the subject of a juvenile proceeding pursuant to this article 2.5 shall attend any such proceeding.

Nothing in this subsection (3) creates a right for any juvenile to have the juvenile's parent or guardian present at any proceeding at which the juvenile is present.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 607, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-515 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-612. Mental health services for juvenile - how and when issue raised - procedure - definitions.

At any stage of a delinquency proceeding, if the court, prosecution, probation officer, guardian ad litem, parent, or legal guardian has reason to believe that the juvenile could benefit from mental health services, the party shall immediately advise
the court of that belief.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until December 31, 2022.] After the party advises the court of the party's belief that the juvenile could benefit from mental health services, the court shall immediately order a mental health
screening of the juvenile pursuant to section 16-11.9-102 using the mental health screening tool selected pursuant to section 24-33.5-2402 (1)(b), unless the court already has sufficient information to determine whether the juvenile
could benefit from mental health services or unless a mental health screening of the juvenile has been completed within the last three months. Before sentencing a juvenile, the court shall order a mental health screening using
the mental health screening tool selected pursuant to section 24-33.5-2402 (1)(b) or make a finding that the screening would not provide information that would be helpful in sentencing the juvenile. The court shall not stay or
suspend delinquency proceedings pending the results of the mental health screening ordered pursuant this section. However, the court may continue the dispositional and sentencing hearing to await the results of the mental health
screening.

(2)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective December 31, 2022.

]
After the party advises the court of the party's belief that the juvenile could benefit from mental health services, the court shall immediately order a mental health screening of the juvenile pursuant to section
16-11.9-102 using the mental health screening tool selected pursuant to section 24-33.5-2402 (1)(b), as it existed prior to its repeal in 2022, unless the court already has sufficient information to determine whether the juvenile
could benefit from mental health services or unless a mental health screening of the juvenile has been completed within the last three months. Before sentencing a juvenile, the court shall order a mental health screening using
the mental health screening tool selected pursuant to section 24-33.5-2402 (1)(b), as it existed prior to its repeal in 2022, or make a finding that the screening would not provide information that would be helpful in sentencing
the juvenile. The court shall not stay or suspend delinquency proceedings pending the results of the mental health screening ordered pursuant this section. However, the court may continue the dispositional and sentencing hearing
to await the results of the mental health screening.

If the mental health screening indicates that the juvenile could benefit from mental health services, the court may order a mental health assessment.

At the time the court orders a mental health assessment, the court shall specify the date upon which the assessment must be completed and returned to the court. The court may assign responsibility for the cost of the assessment to any party having legal
custody or legal guardianship of the juvenile.

The assessment, at a minimum, must include an opinion regarding whether the juvenile could benefit from mental health services. If the assessment concludes that the juvenile could benefit from mental health services, the assessment must identify the juvenile's
mental health issues and the appropriate services and treatment.

Evidence or treatment obtained as a result of a mental health screening or assessment ordered pursuant to this section, including any information obtained from the juvenile in the course of a mental health screening or assessment, must be used only for
purposes of sentencing; to determine what mental health treatment, if any, to provide to the juvenile; and to determine whether the juvenile justice or another service system is most appropriate to provide this treatment, and must
not be used for any other purpose. The mental health screening or assessment or any information obtained in the course of the mental health screening or assessment is not subject to subpoena or any other court process for use in
any other court proceeding and is not admissible on the issues raised by a plea of not guilty unless the juvenile places the juvenile's mental health at issue. If the juvenile places the juvenile's mental health at issue, then
either party may introduce evidence obtained as a result of a mental health screening or assessment. The court shall keep any mental health screening or assessment in the court file under seal.

For purposes of this section:

"Assessment" means an objective process used to collect pertinent information in order to identify a juvenile who may have mental health needs and identify the least restrictive and most appropriate services and treatment.

"Juvenile could benefit from mental health services" means a juvenile exhibits one or more of the following characteristics:

A chronic or significant lack of impulse control or of judgment;

Significant abnormal behaviors under normal circumstances;

Severe or frequent changes in sleeping or eating patterns or in levels of activity;

A pervasive mood of unhappiness or of depression; or

A history that includes mental health treatment, a suicide attempt, or the use of psychotropic medication.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (7)(c) is effective until December 31, 2022.] "Screening" means a short validated mental health screening adopted by the juvenile justice reform committee pursuant to section 24-33.5-2402 (1)(b) to identify juveniles
who may have mental health needs.

(c)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (7)(c) is effective December 31, 2022.

]
"Screening" means a short validated mental health screening adopted by the committee on juvenile justice reform pursuant to section 24-33.5-2402 (1)(b), as it existed prior to its repeal in 2022, to identify
juveniles who may have mental health needs.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 608, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(2) and (7)(c) amended, (HB 22-1211), ch. 79, p. 393, § 6, effective December 31.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-710 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-613. Advisement of services.

For any juvenile who is sixteen years of age or older, before terminating jurisdiction, the court shall advise the juvenile that:

If the juvenile was in foster care at sixteen years of age or older, or in noncertified kinship care and adjudicated dependent and neglected, then the juvenile has the right to begin voluntarily receiving child welfare services on or after reaching eighteen
years of age through the foster youth in transition program, established in part 3 of article 7 of this title 19, until the juvenile's twenty-first birthday, or such greater age of foster care eligibility as required by
federal law;

The foster youth in transition program provides the juvenile with access to financial support for housing and other services, as outlined in section 19-7-305; and

If the juvenile is eligible for the foster youth in transition program, the juvenile has the right to counsel through the office of the child's representative.

Source:

L. 2022:
Entire section added, (HB 22-1245), ch. 88, p. 417, § 2, effective August 10.